Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0040.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2. As used in this act, "task force" or "DEPORT task force" means the developing effective policies on orderly removal and transportation (DEPORT) task force created in section 3. Sec. 3. (1) Subject to section 5, the developing effective policies on orderly removal and transportation (DEPORT) task force is created. (2) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint the members of the task force. The task force must consist of the following members: (a) One individual who is a member of the senate. (b) One individual who is a member of the house of representatives. (c) One individual with not less than 20 years of employment as a law enforcement officer in the department of state police. (d) One individual who is a sheriff of a county with a population of less than 75,000. (e) One individual who is a sheriff of a county with a population of 75,000 or more. (f) One individual who is a chief of police of a city with a population of less than 25,000. (g) One individual who is a chief of police of a city with a population of 25,000 or more. (h) One individual who is a county commissioner for a county with a population of less than 75,000. (i) One individual who is a county commissioner for a county with a population of 75,000 or more. (j) One individual who is the chief elected official of a city, township, or village, with a population of less than 25,000. (k) One individual who is the chief elected official of a city, township, or village, with a population of 25,000 or more. (l) One individual who is the prosecuting attorney for a county with a population of less than 75,000. (m) One individual who is the prosecuting attorney for a county with a population of 75,000 or more. (n) One individual with expertise in combating drug trafficking. (o) One individual with expertise in combating human trafficking. (3) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint the members of the task force not more than 7 days after the effective date of this act. (4) If a vacancy occurs on the task force, the speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint an individual to fill the vacancy for the balance of the term. An appointment under this subsection must occur not more than 7 days after a vacancy begins. (5) The speaker of the house of representatives may remove a member of the task force for any reason. (6) The speaker of the house of representatives or the speaker's designee shall call the first meeting of the task force not more than 10 days after the members are appointed under subsection (2). At the first meeting, the task force shall elect a member as a chairperson and may elect other officers that it considers necessary or appropriate. The task force may adopt rules and procedures that are consistent with applicable laws for the task force to carry out the duties under this act. (7) A member of the task force is not entitled to compensation or reimbursement for service on the task force. (8) A writing prepared, owned, used, in the possession of, or retained by the task force is exempt from disclosure under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. Sec. 4. (1) The task force shall do all of the following: (a) Make recommendations to the legislature on the following policies: (i) Policies that will facilitate efforts to deport illegal immigrants in this state. (ii) Policies that will develop further training and guidance to support local law enforcement agencies and the department of state police in interacting with illegal immigrants and communicating with federal agencies about illegal immigrants. (iii) Policies that will ensure this state, local law enforcement agencies, and other individuals involved in the criminal justice system are encouraged to assist the United States Department of Homeland Security in identifying illegal immigrants who are in the criminal justice system in this state to ensure expedient deportation. (b) Provide a preliminary report to the members of the legislature on the policies under subdivision (a) not more than 1 month, and update the report not more than 3 months after, the members are appointed under section 3(2). (c) Provide a final report to the members of the legislature on the policies under subdivision (a) not more than 1 year after the members are appointed under section 3(2). (2) The task force may do any of the following: (a) With the permission of the speaker of the house of representatives, request assistance from legal counsel for the house of representatives. (b) Subject to this subdivision, accept funds, property, labor, services, or other things of value from any public or private agency or person. A grant or donation may only be accepted and expended by the task force in accordance with all applicable law and procedures. (c) Provide recommendations, findings, or reports to the members of the legislature in addition to the reports required under subsection (1)(b) and (c). (3) All departments, committees, commissioners, or officers of this state, so far as is compatible with their duties, shall give a member of the task force any necessary assistance required by the task force in the performance of the official duties of the task force. All departments, committees, commissioners, or officers of this state, so far as is compatible with their duties and consistent with applicable law, shall give a member of the task force free access to any book, record, or document in their custody, that relates to the matters within the scope of inquiry, study, or review of the task force. Sec. 5. The task force is abolished 1 year after the members are appointed under section 3(2).